Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.122

On-site revocation hearing—Representation for alleged violators—Compensation.

(1) At any on-site parole revocation hearing for a person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, the alleged parole violator shall be entitled to be represented by an attorney of his or her own choosing and at his or her own expense, except, upon the presentation of satisfactory evidence of indigency and the request for the appointment of an attorney by the alleged parole violator, the board may cause the appointment of an attorney to represent the alleged parole violator to be paid for at state expense, and, in addition, the board may assume all or such other expenses in the presentation of evidence on behalf of the alleged parole violator as it may have authorized: PROVIDED, That funds are available for the payment of attorneys' fees and expenses. Attorneys for the representation of alleged parole violators in on-site hearings shall be appointed by the superior courts for the counties wherein the on-site parole revocation hearing is to be held and such attorneys shall be compensated in such manner and in such amount as shall be fixed in a schedule of fees adopted by rule of the board.

(2) The rights of offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 are defined in RCW 9.95.435.

[ 2009 c 28 s 28; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 335; 1999 c 143 s 23; 1969 c 98 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Severability—Effective date—1969 c 98: See notes following RCW 9.95.120.